West Virginia, session 2026, HB4430.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 16A. WEST VIRGINIA PARKWAYS AUTHORITY. §17-16A-10.  Parkway revenue bonds, generally. (a) The Parkways Authority is authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of parkway revenue bonds of the state for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of one or more parkway projects. The principal of and the interest on bonds shall be payable solely from the funds provided for payment, except that:(1) None of the proceeds of the issuance of parkway revenue bonds under this section shall be used to pay all or any part of the cost of any economic development project or tourism project;(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting the Parkways Authority from issuing additional parkway revenue bonds to the extent permitted by applicable federal law for the purpose of constructing, maintaining and operating any highway constructed, in whole or in part, with money obtained from the Appalachian Regional Commission; and(3) The authorization to issue bonds under this section is in addition to the authorization and power to issue bonds under any other section of this code.(b) The bonds of each issue shall be dated, shall bear interest at a rate as may be determined by the Parkways Authority in its sole discretion, shall mature at a time not exceeding forty years from their date of issue as may be determined by the Parkways Authority, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the Parkways Authority at a price and under the terms and conditions as may be fixed by the Parkways Authority prior to the issuance of the bonds.(c) The Parkways Authority shall determine the form of the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination of the bonds and the place of payment of principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company or securities depository within or without the state.(d) The bonds shall be executed by manual or facsimile signature by the chair of the Parkways Authority, and the official seal of the Parkways Authority shall be affixed to or printed on each bond, and attested, manually or by facsimile signature, by the Secretary and Treasurer of the Parkways Authority. Any coupons attached to any bond shall bear the manual or facsimile signature of the chair of the Parkways Authority.(e) In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature appears on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be an officer before the delivery of the bonds, the signature or facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until delivery. In case the seal of the Parkways Authority has been changed after a facsimile has been imprinted on the bonds, then the facsimile seal will continue to be sufficient for all purposes.(f) All bonds issued under the provisions of this article shall have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the negotiable instruments law of the state. The bonds may be issued in coupon or in registered form, or both, as the Parkways Authority may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, and for the recorders into coupon bonds of any bonds registered as to both principal and interest.(g) The Parkways Authority may sell the bonds at a public or private sale at a price it determines to be in the best interests of the state.(h) The proceeds of the bonds of each issue shall be used solely for the payment of the cost of the parkway project or parkway projects and by the Division of Highways for any acquisition, construction, reconstruction, maintenance, improvement or repair of public highways and bridges as provided for in this article for which the bonds were issued, and shall be disbursed in a manner consistent with the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust agreement securing the bonds.(i) If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue, by error of estimates or otherwise, shall be less than the cost, then additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide the amount of the deficit. Unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust agreement securing the bonds, the additional bonds shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without preference or priority of the bonds first issued.(j) If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue exceed the cost of the parkway project or parkway projects for which the bonds were issued, then the surplus shall be deposited to the credit of the sinking fund for the bonds.(k) Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the Parkways Authority may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when the bonds have been executed and are available for delivery. The Parkways Authority may also provide for the replacement of any bonds that become mutilated or are destroyed or lost.(l) All or any portion of the proceeds of any parkway revenue bonds issued pursuant to this section may be credited to the special revenue account within the State Road Fund created in section eleven of this article §17-16A-11 of this code. Moneys in such fund shall be used by the Division of Highways for any acquisition, construction, reconstruction, maintenance, improvement or repair of public highways and bridges in this state.(m) Bonds may be issued under the provisions of this article without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, bureau or agency of the state in accordance with this article: Provided, That the Parkways Authority shall comply with the provisions of section twenty-eight, article one, chapter five §5-1-28 of this code.(n) On July 1, 2026, the powers granted in this section to the Authority shall terminate.  After that date, no additional bonds may be issued on any parkways project, or on any expansion or material alteration to any existing parkways project. §17-16A-21. Parkway revenue refunding bonds, generally. The Parkways Authority is hereby authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of parkway revenue refunding bonds of the state for the purpose of refunding any bonds then outstanding which shall have been issued or may be issued under the provisions of this article in connection with the construction of any parkway project, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such bonds; and, if deemed advisable by the Parkways Authority, for the additional purpose of constructing improvements, extensions or enlargements of the project or projects in connection with which the bonds to be refunded shall have been issued: Provided, That this section shall not be construed as authorizing the issuance of parkway revenue refunding bonds for the purpose of refunding any bonds then outstanding which shall have been issued under the provisions of this article, or any predecessor thereof, in connection with the construction of the West Virginia Turnpike, which revenue refunding bonds may be issued only as authorized under section twenty-two of this article §17-16A-22 of this code. The issuance of such bonds, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof and the rights, duties and obligations of the Parkways Authority in respect of the same shall be governed by the provisions of this article insofar as the same may be applicable. No issuance of a refunding bond may extend the maturity date of such bond being refunded and may not exceed the outstanding principal of such bond being refunded. Any refunding bond shall be structured to provide for approximately level annual debt service savings each fiscal year through the final maturity or structured to approximate the level of debt service that would have been paid prior to the refunding, with a preponderance of the savings being deferred toward eliminating or reducing the most distant maturities. For purposes of this section, the outstanding principal is to be determined as of the date on which the revenue bond is refinanced. On July 1, 2026, the powers granted in this section to the Authority shall terminate.  After that date, no additional bonds may be issued on any parkways project, or on any expansion or material alteration to any existing parkways project. §17-16A-25. Additional powers of parkways authority; issuance of special obligation bonds. (a) In addition to all powers granted by the foregoing sections of this article, the parkways authority in connection with a proceeding prosecuted to completion under Title 11, United States Code, Secs. 401-403, as permitted by subdivision (17), section six of this article §17-16A-6(17) of this code is hereby authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of special obligation bonds of the state for the purpose of exchanging such special obligation bonds for all bonds then outstanding which shall have been issued under the provisions of this article. Special obligation bonds issued under the provisions of this section shall not be deemed to constitute a debt of the state or of any political subdivision thereof or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or of any such political subdivision, but such bonds shall be payable solely from the funds herein provided therefor from pledged property and income therefrom as provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection. All such special obligation bonds shall contain on the face thereof a statement in accordance with the preceding sentence. The issuance of such bonds, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties and obligations of the parkways authority in respect of the same shall be governed by the provisions of this article insofar as the same may be applicable with the following express exceptions: (1) The principal of and the interest on such special obligation bonds shall not be payable from tolls, rents, fees, charges or revenues of any parkway project but shall be payable solely from such other property purchased and pledged as security therefor as the parkways authority shall determine together with the income derived therefrom which other property may include direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and the interest on which are guaranteed by, the United States government or participation certificates or other obligations issued by or by authority of the United States government; and (2) Following the issuance of such special obligation bonds there shall be no obligation to fix, revise, charge and collect tolls for the use of any parkway project and any parkway project shall be transferred to the state department of highways and shall thereafter be maintained by the state department of highways free of tolls. At such time as the special obligation bonds are issued, then section eighteen of this article §17-16A-18 of this code shall be of no further force and effect. (b) Financial, legal, engineering and feasibility consultants may be employed to perform such services as the parkways authority shall deem necessary or desirable in connection with the Title 11 proceedings mentioned above and the issuance and exchange of the special obligation bonds. (c) The entire powers herein granted by this section to the parkways authority may be exercised by the state department of highways in which event the special obligation bonds herein authorized shall be executed by manual or facsimile signature by the Governor and by the commissioner of the department of highways, and the official seal of the department of highways shall be affixed to or printed on each bond, and any coupons attached to such bonds shall bear the manual or facsimile signature of the commissioner of the state department of highways. In the event that the state department of highways shall elect to exercise the powers granted by this section, it shall file a statement to that effect in the office of the chairman of the parkways authority and in the office of the Secretary of State, and upon the issuance of the special obligation bonds herein provided for, the state department of highways shall succeed immediately to the principal functions of the parkways authority and the parkways authority shall then be abolished. (d) The state department of highways is hereby empowered to acquire by purchase the parkways authority and all its rights-of-way, equipment, facilities and any and all other rights or interest the parkways authority has or had in any project, from any funds available to it, and to pay any expenses incident to such acquisition under the provisions of this article: Provided, That the contribution of the state department of highways in making such acquisition shall not exceed the sum of $20 million from all sources of public moneys of the State of West Virginia, excluding any funds reimbursed or reimbursable or otherwise provided or to be provided by the federal government. No funds derived from the sale of the $350 million bond issue authorized by the roads development amendment shall be included in the acquisition of the West Virginia Turnpike. (e) On July 1, 2026, the powers granted in this section to the Authority shall terminate.  After that date, no additional bonds may be issued on any parkways project, or on any expansion or material alteration to any existing parkways project.